Hawaii statutes.
[§667-97]
Postponement, cancellation of sale. (a) The public sale may be either
postponed or canceled by the association. Notice of the postponement or the
cancellation of the public sale shall be:

(1) Announced by the association at the
date, time, and place of the last scheduled public sale; and

(2) Provided to any other person who is
entitled to receive the notice of default under section 667-92.

(b) If there is a postponement of the public
sale of the unit, a new public notice of the public sale shall be published
once in the format described in section 667-96. The new public notice shall
state that it is a notice of a postponed sale. The public sale shall take
place no sooner than fourteen days after the date of the publication of the new
public notice. Not less than fourteen days before the date of the public sale,
a copy of the new public notice shall be posted on the unit or on another real
property of which the unit is a part, and it shall be mailed or delivered to
the unit owner and to any other person entitled to receive notice under section
667-92(e).

(c) Upon the fourth postponement of every
series of four consecutive postponements, the association shall follow all of
the public notice of public sale requirements of section 667-96, including the
requirements of mailing and posting under section 667-96(c) and of publication
under section 667-96(d).

(d) The default under the association
documents may be cured no later than three business days before the date of the
public sale of the unit by paying the entire amount that would be owed to the
association if the payments under the association documents had not been
accelerated, plus the association's attorney's fees and costs, and all other
fees and costs incurred by the association related to the default, unless
otherwise agreed to between the association and the unit owner. There is no
right to cure the default or any right of redemption after that time. If the
default is so cured, the public sale shall be canceled. [L 2012, c 182, pt of
§3(2)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next